Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 7. Air Services Financial Aid [Renumbered]

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2003, ch. 210, § 1, and Laws 2003, ch. 211, § 1, both enacted an article 6 in chapter 12 of title 9. The provisions enacted by Laws 2003, ch. 210, § 1, were redesignated as article 7 (§§

9-12-701

and 9-12-702) by the legislative service office and internal references were changed to correspond with the redesignation. Laws 2005, ch. 13, renumbered article 7 in chapter 9 of title 9 as article 6 in chapter 3 of article 10.

§§ 9-12-701 and 9-12-702.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §§

10-3-601

and

10-3-602

by Laws 2005, ch. 13, § 1.

§ 9-12-703.
Loans for airport construction and improvement and air service promotion; authority to make; security; rulemaking authority; limitation. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 45, § 1; 2003, ch. 104, § 1; 2005, ch. 208, § 1; renumbered from §

10-3-403

by 2013 ch. 138, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.